Florida, session 2026, SB712.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 26 27 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âDirect Sales 28 Consumer Protection Act.â 29 Section 2.âSection 849.091, Florida Statutes, is amended to 30 read: 31 849.091âChain letters, pyramid clubs, etc., declared a 32 lottery; prohibited; penalties.â 33 (1)âThe organization of any chain letter club, pyramid 34 club, or other group organized or brought together under any 35 plan or device whereby fees or dues or anything of material 36 value to be paid or given by members thereof are to be paid or 37 given to any other member thereof, which plan or device includes 38 any provision for the increase in such membership through a 39 chain process of new members securing other new members and 40 thereby advancing themselves in the group to a position where 41 such members in turn receive fees, dues, or things of material 42 value from other members, is hereby declared to be a lottery, 43 and whoever shall participate in any such lottery by becoming a 44 member of, or affiliating with, any such group or organization 45 or who shall solicit any person for membership or affiliation in 46 any such group or organization commits a misdemeanor of the 47 first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 48 775.083. 49 (2)âA âpyramid sales scheme,â which is any sales or 50 marketing plan or operation whereby a person pays a 51 consideration of any kind, or makes an investment of any kind, 52 in excess of $100 and acquires the opportunity to receive a 53 benefit or thing of value which is not primarily contingent on 54 the volume or quantity of goods, services, or other property 55 sold in bona fide sales to consumers, and which is related to 56 the inducement of additional persons, by himself or herself or 57 others, regardless of number, to participate in the same sales 58 or marketing plan or operation, is hereby declared to be a 59 lottery, and whoever shall participate in any such lottery by 60 becoming a member of or affiliating with, any such group or 61 organization or who shall solicit any person for membership or 62 affiliation in any such group or organization commits a 63 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 64 775.082 or s. 775.083. For purposes of this subsection, the term 65 âconsiderationâ and the term âinvestmentâ do not include the 66 purchase of goods or services furnished at cost for use in 67 making sales, but not for resale, or time and effort spent in 68 the pursuit of sales or recruiting activities. 69 Section 3.âSection 849.0913, Florida Statutes, is created 70 to read: 71 849.0913âPyramid promotional schemes prohibited; 72 enforcement; remedies; penalties.â 73 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 74 (a)ââCompensationâ means a payment of any money, thing of 75 value, or financial benefit conferred in return for inducing a 76 person to participate in a pyramid promotional scheme. 77 (b)ââConsiderationâ means the payment of money or the 78 purchase of a product, good, service, or intangible property. 79 The term does not include the purchase of a product or service 80 furnished at cost to be used in making a sale and not for resale 81 or any time and effort spent in pursuit of sales or recruiting 82 activities. 83 (c)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Legal Affairs. 84 (d)ââParticipantâ means a person who takes part in a 85 pyramid promotional scheme. 86 (e)ââPyramid promotional schemeâ means a plan or an 87 operation in which a person pays or gives consideration for the 88 right to receive compensation based on recruiting other persons 89 into the plan or operation rather than from the sale and 90 consumption of products, goods, services, or intangible property 91 by a participant or other person introduced into the plan or 92 operation. The term includes a plan or an operation in which the 93 number of persons who may participate is limited either 94 expressly or by the application of conditions affecting the 95 eligibility of a person to receive compensation under the plan 96 or operation, or a plan or an operation in which a person, upon 97 giving consideration, obtains any products, goods, services, or 98 intangible property in addition to the right to receive 99 compensation. 100 (2)âA person may not establish, promote, operate, or 101 participate in a pyramid promotional scheme, even if such 102 person, upon giving consideration, obtains products, goods, 103 services, or intangible property in addition to the right to 104 receive compensation. 105 (3)(a)âThis section does not prohibit a plan or an 106 operation in which participants give consideration in return for 107 the right to receive compensation based on the purchase of 108 products, goods, services, or intangible property by 109 participants for personal use, consumption, or resale so long as 110 the plan or operation: 111 1.âDoes not promote or induce a practice in which a pyramid 112 promotional scheme requires its independent salesperson to 113 purchase inventory in an amount exceeding that which the 114 salesperson can expect to resell for ultimate consumption or 115 consumption in a reasonable time period, or both; and 116 2.âImplements a program in which a plan or an operation 117 repurchases from a salesperson, upon request and pursuant to 118 commercially reasonable terms, current and marketable inventory 119 in the possession of the salesperson which was purchased during 120 his or her business relationship for resale. Such plan or 121 operation must clearly describe the program in its business 122 recruiting literature, sales manual, or contract with 123 independent salespersons, including the disclosure of inventory 124 that is not eligible for repurchase under the program. 125 (b)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term: 126 1.ââCommercially reasonable termsâ means the repurchase of 127 current and marketable inventory within 12 months after the date 128 of purchase at not less than 90 percent of the original net 129 cost, less appropriate setoffs and legal claims, if any. 130 2.ââCurrent and marketable inventoryâ does not include any 131 inventory that: 132 a.âIs no longer within its commercially reasonable use or 133 shelf-life period; 134 b.âWas clearly described to the salesperson before purchase 135 as being seasonal, discontinued, or special promotional goods, 136 products, or services that are not subject to the inventory 137 repurchase program; or 138 c.âHas been used or opened. 139 3.ââInventoryâ includes products, goods, and services, 140 including company-produced promotional materials, sales aids, 141 and sales kits that the plan or operation requires independent 142 salespersons to purchase. 143 (4)(a)âWhenever the department has reason to believe that a 144 person has been, or is, violating this section, and if it 145 appears to the department that a cease and desist order against 146 such person would be in the interest of the public, the 147 department shall issue and serve upon such person a complaint 148 and cease and desist order stating its charges in that respect 149 and containing a notice of a hearing upon a day and at the place 150 therein fixed at least 15 days after the service of the 151 complaint. The hearing shall be held in conformity with chapter 152 120. 153 (b)âThe department may modify or set aside its order at any 154 time by rehearing upon its own motion when such rehearing is in 155 the interest of the public welfare. 156 (c)âJudicial review of orders of the department must be in 157 accordance with s. 120.68, take precedence over other civil 158 cases pending, and be expedited in every way. 159 (d)âAn order of the department to cease and desist does not 160 become effective until 10 days after all administrative action 161 has been concluded or, if an appeal is made to the district 162 court of appeal and bond is posted, until a final order has been 163 entered by that court. 164 (e)âA cease and desist order may not act as a limitation 165 upon any other action or remedy available. 166 (f)âWhen a court remands an order of the department for 167 rehearing, such rehearing must be held within 45 days after the 168 remand. 169 (g)âA person who violates a cease and desist order of the 170 department after it has become final and while such order is in 171 effect shall forfeit and pay to the state a civil penalty of up 172 to $10,000 for each violation which shall accrue to the state 173 and may be recovered in a civil action brought by the state. 174 Each separate violation of such an order is a separate offense, 175 except that in the case of a violation through continuing 176 failure or neglect to obey a final order of the department, each 177 day of continuance of such failure or neglect is deemed a 178 separate offense. 179 (5)(a)âWhenever the department has reason to believe that a 180 person has been, or is, violating this section, the person must 181 be prosecuted by the department in accordance with s. 16.56. 182 (b)âA person who is convicted of establishing, promoting, 183 or operating a pyramid promotional scheme commits a felony of 184 the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 185 775.083, or s. 775.084. 186 (c)âA person who is convicted of participating in a pyramid 187 promotional scheme commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, 188 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 189 (d)âWhen a person is convicted of an offense under this 190 section, the court, pursuant to s. 775.089, shall order the 191 person to pay restitution to the victim or victims of the 192 offense. In determining the value of the property loss, the 193 court shall include expenses incurred in the investigation or 194 prosecution of the offense as well as the disgorgement of any 195 profits realized by a person convicted of the offense. 196 (6)(a)âIn addition to the remedies provided in this 197 section, the department may apply to any circuit court of this 198 state for the issuance of a temporary or permanent injunction, 199 or both, for the purpose of enforcing this section. In any such 200 action, an order or a judgment may be entered awarding such 201 temporary or permanent injunction as may be deemed proper. Such 202 injunction must be issued without bond. A single act in 203 violation of this section is sufficient to authorize the 204 issuance of an injunction. 205 (b)âIn addition to all other means provided by law for the 206 enforcement of an injunction, the court in which such action is 207 brought shall have power and jurisdiction to appoint one or more 208 receivers for the property and business of a person who has 209 been, or is, violating this section, including books, papers, 210 documents, and records pertaining thereto, or as much thereof as 211 the court may deem reasonably necessary to prevent violations of 212 the law or injury to the public through, or by means of, the use 213 of such property and business. The receiver, when so appointed 214 and qualified, shall have such powers and duties as to custody, 215 collection, administration, winding up, and liquidation of such 216 property and business as is, from time to time, conferred upon 217 him or her by the court. In any such action, the court may issue 218 an order staying all pending civil actions and the court, in its 219 discretion, may require that all civil actions be assigned to 220 the circuit court judge who appointed the receiver. 221 (7)âThe provisions and penalties set forth in this section 222 are in addition to any other civil, administrative, or criminal 223 action provided by law. 224 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.